Massachusetts, session 194th, H153.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 111 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2018 Official Edition, is hereby
amended by inserting after section 70H the following section:-
Section 70I. A facility, as defined in section 70E, physician or health care provider shall
not: (1) test any person for the presence of marijuana or delta-9-tetrahydricannabinol, also known
as THC, without first obtaining that person’s written informed consent; (2) disclose the results of
such test to any person other than the subject of the test without first obtaining the subject’s
written informed consent; or (3) identify the subject of such tests to any person without first
obtaining the subject’s written informed consent. A written consent form shall state the purpose
for which the information is being requested and shall be distinguished from written consent for
the release of any other medical information.
of 2

Whoever violates this section shall be considered to have violated section 2 of chapter
93A.
For the purpose of this section “written informed consent” shall mean a written consent
form for each requested test and release of the results of a test performed on an individual
showing the presence of marijuana or THC or for the release of medical records containing such
information.
of 2